test/src/morphology/N-toll_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - toll: # Noun 'fire' - full paradigm
     toll+N+Sg+Nom: toll
     toll+N+Sg+Gen: tool
     toll+N+Sg+Acc: tool
     toll+N+Sg+Ill: toˊlle
     toll+N+Sg+Loc: toolâst
     toll+N+Sg+Com: toolin
     toll+N+Sg+Ess: tollân
     toll+N+Sg+Par: tollâd
     toll+N+Sg+Abe: tooltää
     toll+N+Pl+Nom: tool
     toll+N+Pl+Gen: tooli
     toll+N+Pl+Acc: toolid
     toll+N+Pl+Ill: toolid
     toll+N+Pl+Loc: toolin
     toll+N+Pl+Com: toolivuiˊm
     toll+N+Pl+Abe: toolitää


     
     
